Utah statutes.
40-10-30.   Judicial review of rules or orders.
(1)  Judicial review of adjudicative proceedings under this chapter is
governed by Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, and
provisions of this chapter consistent with the Administrative Procedures Act.
(2)  Judicial review of the board's rulemaking procedures and rules adopted
under this chapter is governed by Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act.
(3)  An appeal from an order of the board shall be directly to the Utah
Supreme Court and is not a trial de novo.  The court shall set aside the board
action if it is found to be:
(a)  unreasonable, unjust, arbitrary, capricious, or an abuse of discretion;
(b)  contrary to constitutional right, power, privilege, or immunity;
(c)  in excess of statutory jurisdiction, authority, or limitations;
(d)  not in compliance with procedure required by law;
(e)  based upon a clearly erroneous interpretation or application of the law;
or
(f)  as to an adjudicative proceeding, unsupported by substantial evidence on
the record.
(4)  An action or appeal involving an order of the board shall be determined
as expeditiously as feasible and in accordance with Section 78A-3-102.  The
Utah Supreme Court shall determine the issues on both questions of law and
fact and shall affirm or set aside the rule or order, enjoin or stay the
effective date of agency action, or remand the cause to the board for further
proceedings.  Judicial review of disputed issues of fact shall be confined to
the agency record.  The court may, in its discretion, receive additional
evidence for good cause shown.
(5)  If the board fails to perform any act or duty under this chapter which is
not discretionary, the aggrieved person may bring an action in the district
court of the county in which the operation or proposed operation is located.
